Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.445

Partner—Payment demand—Entitlement.

(1) A partner who demands payment retains all other rights of a partner in the partnership until the proposed merger becomes effective.

(2) A partner in a partnership sent a dissenters' notice who does not demand payment by the date set in the dissenters' notice is not entitled to payment for the partner's interest in the partnership under this article.

[ 1998 c 103 s 1006.]